Utah statutes.
63G-2-102.   Legislative intent.
(1)  In enacting this act, the Legislature recognizes two constitutional
rights:
(a)  the public's right of access to information concerning the conduct of the
public's business; and
(b)  the right of privacy in relation to personal data gathered by
governmental entities.
(2)  The Legislature also recognizes a public policy interest in allowing a
government to restrict access to certain records, as specified in this
chapter, for the public good.
(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature to:
(a)  promote the public's right of easy and reasonable access to unrestricted
public records;
(b)  specify those conditions under which the public interest in allowing
restrictions on access to records may outweigh the public's interest in
access;
(c)  prevent abuse of confidentiality by governmental entities by permitting
confidential treatment of records only as provided in this chapter;
(d)  provide guidelines for both disclosure and restrictions on access to
government records, which are based on the equitable weighing of the pertinent
interests and which are consistent with nationwide standards of information
practices;
(e)  favor public access when, in the application of this act, countervailing
interests are of equal weight; and
(f)  establish fair and reasonable records management practices.
